Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.075

Gambling commission—Denial, suspension, or revocation of license, permit—Other provisions not applicable.

The commission may deny an application, or suspend or revoke any license or permit issued by it, for any reason or reasons, it deems to be in the public interest. These reasons shall include, but not be limited to, cases wherein the applicant or licensee, or any person with any interest therein:

(1) Has violated, failed or refused to comply with the provisions, requirements, conditions, limitations or duties imposed by chapter 9.46 RCW and any amendments thereto, or any rules adopted by the commission pursuant thereto, or when a violation of any provision of chapter 9.46 RCW, or any commission rule, has occurred upon any premises occupied or operated by any such person or over which he or she has substantial control;

(2) Knowingly causes, aids, abets, or conspires with another to cause, any person to violate any of the laws of this state or the rules of the commission;

(3) Has obtained a license or permit by fraud, misrepresentation, concealment, or through inadvertence or mistake;

(4) Has been convicted of, or forfeited bond upon a charge of, or pleaded guilty to, forgery, larceny, extortion, conspiracy to defraud, wilful failure to make required payments or reports to a governmental agency at any level, or filing false reports therewith, or of any similar offense or offenses, or of bribing or otherwise unlawfully influencing a public official or employee of any state or the United States, or of any crime, whether a felony or misdemeanor involving any gambling activity or physical harm to individuals or involving moral turpitude;

(5) Denies the commission or its authorized representatives, including authorized local law enforcement agencies, access to any place where a licensed activity is conducted or who fails promptly to produce for inspection or audit any book, record, document or item required by law or commission rule;

(6) Shall fail to display its license on the premises where the licensed activity is conducted at all times during the operation of the licensed activity;

(7) Makes a misrepresentation of, or fails to disclose, a material fact to the commission;

(8) Fails to prove, by clear and convincing evidence, that he, she or it is qualified in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;

(9) Is subject to current prosecution or pending charges, or a conviction which is under appeal, for any of the offenses included under subsection (4) of this section: PROVIDED, That at the request of an applicant for an original license, the commission may defer decision upon the application during the pendency of such prosecution or appeal;

(10) Has pursued or is pursuing economic gain in an occupational manner or context which is in violation of the criminal or civil public policy of this state if such pursuit creates probable cause to believe that the participation of such person in gambling or related activities would be inimical to the proper operation of an authorized gambling or related activity in this state. For the purposes of this section, occupational manner or context shall be defined as the systematic planning, administration, management or execution of an activity for financial gain;

(11) Is a career offender or a member of a career offender cartel or an associate of a career offender or career offender cartel in such a manner which creates probable cause to believe that the association is of such a nature as to be inimical to the policy of this chapter or to the proper operation of the authorized gambling or related activities in this state. For the purposes of this section, career offender shall be defined as any person whose behavior is pursued in an occupational manner or context for the purpose of economic gain utilizing such methods as are deemed criminal violations of the public policy of this state. A career offender cartel shall be defined as any group of persons who operate together as career offenders.

For the purpose of reviewing any application for a license and for considering the denial, suspension or revocation of any license the gambling commission may consider any prior criminal conduct of the applicant or licensee and the provisions of RCW 9.95.240 and of chapter 9.96A RCW shall not apply to such cases.

[ 1981 c 139 s 4; 1975 1st ex.s. c 166 s 12.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 139: See note following RCW 9.46.070.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 166: See note following RCW 9.46.090.